test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tervheiset_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tervheiset - ok : # Noun 'tid' n_42pl - ei tsekattu
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Nom: tervheiset
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Gen: tervheisten
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Par: tervheisii
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Tra: tervheisiksi
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Abe: tervheisittä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ine: tervheisissä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ela: tervheisistä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ill: tervheishiin
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ade: tervheisillä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Abl: tervheisiltä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+All: tervheisille
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ess: tervheisinnä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Com: tervheisine
